Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-408
Partnership subject to amendment or repeal of act.

A partnership governed by the Uniform Partnership Act of 1998 is subject to any amendment to or repeal of the act.

Laws 1997, LB 523, § 8.